Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.735

Suicide prevention—Identification cards.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5355-S2.SL) ***

(1) Within existing resources, every institution of higher education as defined in RCW 28B.10.016 that issues student identification cards, faculty or staff identification cards, or both, must have printed on either side of the identification cards:

(a) The contact information for a national suicide prevention organization; and

(b) The contact information for one or more campus, local, state, or national organizations specializing in suicide prevention, crisis intervention, or counseling, if available.

(2) The requirements in subsection (1) of this section apply to student identification cards and faculty or staff identification cards issued for the first time and issued to replace a damaged or lost identification card.

[2020 c 39 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2020 c 39: See note following RCW 28A.210.400.